Alaska statutes. Title 14. Education, Libraries, and Museums.
Chapter 34. Interstate Compact on Educational Opportunity for Military Children.

Cross references. —

For effect of provisions of the Interstate Compact enacted by AS

14.34.010

on Rules 4 (relating to service of process) and 24(b) (relating to standing to intervene in a judicial proceeding) of the Alaska Rules of Civil Procedure, see §§ 2 and 3, ch. 10, SLA 2009 in the 2009 Temporary and Special Acts.

Effective dates. —

Section 4, ch. 10, SLA 2009 makes this chapter effective May 16, 2009, in accordance with AS

01.10.070(c)

.